Illinois, session 104th, HB4240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5College Meal Plan Medical Exemption Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to protect 7students from mandatory meal plan charges if a medical 8condition prevents safe participation in a college or 9university meal program. This Act ensures full exemption from 10such charges and prohibits postsecondary institutions from 11imposing additional fees, housing surcharges, or other 12financial conditions to circumvent the exemption. 13    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:14    "Institution" means a public or private college, 15university, or other postsecondary institution operating in 16this State that requires a meal plan for some or all of its 17residential students.18    "Mandatory meal plan" means a meal plan required as a 19condition of enrollment, housing, or participation in campus 20residential life, regardless of label, pricing tier, or 21structure.22    "Medical exemption" means a written statement from a   HB4240- 2 -LRB104 16700 LNS 30104 b1medical provider indicating that a student has a medical 2condition, allergy, dietary restriction, or other 3health-related need that is inconsistent with participation in 4a mandatory meal plan.5    "Medical provider" means a licensed physician, physician 6assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse.7    "Student" means an individual subject to a mandatory meal 8plan at an institution. 9    Section 15. Submission of medical exemption.10    (a) An institution shall process a student's medical 11exemption within 10 business days after submission of the 12medical exemption to the institution.13    (b) A medical exemption may not be denied, limited, or 14conditioned by an institution.15    (c) An institution may not request that additional 16documentation be submitted beyond the medical exemption 17submission.18    (d) A submitted medical exemption remains valid for one 19academic year, unless the medical provider indicates that the 20medical exemption is permanent. 21    Section 20. Full exemption from charges; voluntary 22purchase.23    (a) A student who submits a medical exemption may not be 24charged any portion of a mandatory meal plan.  HB4240- 3 -LRB104 16700 LNS 30104 b1    (b) An institution may not impose any of the following on a 2student who submits a medical exemption:3        (1) Minimum meal requirements.4        (2) Partial or prorated meal plan charges.5        (3) Administrative fees.6        (4) Access fees.7        (5) Service fees.8        (6) Wellness or nutrition fees.9        (7) Infrastructure or dining facility fees.10        (8) Any other fee or financial obligation, however 11    labeled, that has the effect of charging a student for 12    meal plan participation following the submission of a 13    medical exemption.14    (c) A student with a submitted medical exemption may 15voluntarily purchase an optional meal plan if offered by an 16institution, but no institution may condition housing access 17or enrollment on voluntary purchase. 18    Section 25. Housing protections.19    (a) An institution may not increase housing charges for a 20student, impose additional housing fees on a student, or 21require a student to reside in a different or more expensive 22housing assignment due to receipt of a medical exemption from 23the student.24    (b) No student may be penalized in housing priority, 25placement, or availability due to the student's medical   HB4240- 4 -LRB104 16700 LNS 30104 b1exemption. 2    Section 30. Prohibited practices. No institution may:3        (1) bundle meal plan costs with housing charges for a 4    student with a submitted medical exemption;5        (2) delay processing of a student's medical exemption 6    beyond 10 business days;7        (3) condition a medical exemption submission on 8    disability classification, federal Section 504 9    eligibility, institutional approval, or additional 10    institutional review;11        (4) deny housing to a student with a submitted medical 12    exemption; or13        (5) impose academic, residential, or enrollment 14    restrictions on a student due to the student's submitted 15    medical exemption. 16    Section 35. Transparency requirements.17    (a) Each institution shall publish its medical exemption 18process prominently on its website.19    (b) The information required to be published under 20subsection (a) must include:21        (1) how to request a medical exemption;22        (2) expected processing timelines; and23        (3) contact information for assistance.24    (c) An institution shall provide a student with written   HB4240- 5 -LRB104 16700 LNS 30104 b1confirmation once the student submits a medical exemption. 2    Section 40. Refund requirement. An institution that 3charges a student in violation of this Act shall issue a full 4refund of the improper charges within 30 days after discovery 5by the institution or notification by the student. 6    Section 45. Penalty for violation.7    (a) Any institution that violates this Act is subject to a 8civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per violation, to be 9imposed by the Board of Higher Education after an 10administrative proceeding is held as determined by rule.11    (b) Each student affected by a violation of this Act 12constitutes a separate violation of this Act.13    (c) The Attorney General may bring an action in circuit 14court to enforce the collection of any monetary penalty 15imposed under this Section.16    (d) A student may file a complaint with the Board of Higher 17Education for a violation of this Act. 18    Section 50. Act construction. Nothing in this Act 19prohibits an institution from offering an optional meal plan 20or dining service to a student who voluntarily elects to 21purchase an optional meal plan or dining service. 22    Section 90. Rulemaking. The Board of Higher Education may   HB4240- 6 -LRB104 16700 LNS 30104 b1adopt any rules necessary to implement and administer this 2Act. 3    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 4severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 62027.